Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.160

Right of entry—Warrant for noxious weed search—Civil liability—Penalty for preventing entry.

Any authorized agent or employee of the county noxious weed control board or of the state noxious weed control board or of the department of agriculture where not otherwise proscribed by law may enter upon any property for the purpose of administering this chapter and any power exercisable pursuant thereto, including the taking of specimens of weeds, general inspection, and the performance of eradication or control work. Prior to carrying out the purpose for which the entry is made, the official making such entry or someone in his or her behalf, shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner of the property as to the purpose and need for the entry.

(1) When there is probable cause to believe that there is property within this state not otherwise exempt from process or execution upon which noxious weeds are standing or growing and the owner refuses permission to inspect the property, a judge of the superior court or district court in the county in which the property is located may, upon the request of the county noxious weed control board or its agent, issue a warrant directed to the board or agent authorizing the taking of specimens of weeds or other materials, general inspection, and the performance of eradication or control work.

(2) Application for issuance and execution and return of the warrant authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the applicable rules of the superior court or the district courts.

(3) Nothing in this section requires the application for and issuance of any warrant not otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That civil liability for negligence shall lie in any case in which entry and any of the activities connected therewith are not undertaken with reasonable care.

(4) Any person who improperly prevents or threatens to prevent entry upon land as authorized in this section or any person who interferes with the carrying out of this chapter shall be upon conviction guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1997 c 353 s 20; 1987 c 438 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 16.]